Idaho, session 2026, S1361.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Public Safety the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION:
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,526,700 $16,230,700 $28,757,400
Inmate Labor
Fund 390,700 85,000 475,700
Parolee Supervision
Fund 346,200 132,300 478,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,351,000 397,400 1,748,400
TOTAL $14,614,600 $16,845,400 $31,460,000
II. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,893,500 $3,620,800 $10,514,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 400,600 161,400 562,000
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund $160,000 160,000
Federal Grant
Fund 729,000 770,300 0 1,499,300
TOTAL $8,023,100 $4,552,500 $160,000 $12,735,600
B. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $32,291,900 $4,457,300 $36,749,200
Inmate Labor
Fund 56,100 56,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 862,500 224,000 1,086,500
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 1,235,200 1,235,200
TOTAL $33,154,400 $5,972,600 $39,127,000
C. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL CENTER - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,156,600 $6,544,800 $37,701,400
Inmate Labor
Fund 19,000 19,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 382,300 382,300
TOTAL $31,156,600 $6,946,100 $38,102,700
D. IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - OROFINO:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,749,400 $1,968,900 $13,718,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 1,288,300 544,000 1,832,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 96,900 67,200 164,100
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 57,100 57,100
TOTAL $13,134,600 $2,637,200 $15,771,800
E. IDAHO MAXIMUM SECURITY INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $15,746,000 $2,379,900 $18,125,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 178,800 178,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 71,100 71,100
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 22,800 22,800
TOTAL $15,746,000 $2,652,600 $18,398,600
F. NORTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - COTTONWOOD:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,271,000 $1,271,700 $8,542,700
Inmate Labor
Fund 49,600 49,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 66,500 114,200 180,700
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 17,800 17,800
TOTAL $7,337,500 $1,453,300 $8,790,800
G. SOUTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,535,600 $2,641,700 $15,177,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 4,387,200 992,900 5,380,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 176,300 109,400 285,700
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 24,700 24,700
TOTAL $17,099,100 $3,768,700 $20,867,800
H. ST. ANTHONY WORK CAMP:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,111,200 $823,100 $6,934,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 1,978,100 667,800 2,645,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 27,000 27,000
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 21,900 21,900
TOTAL $8,089,300 $1,539,800 $9,629,100
I. POCATELLO WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,379,600 $1,331,800 $9,711,400
Inmate Labor
Fund 627,400 162,600 790,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 342,600 120,400 463,000
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 32,100 32,100
TOTAL $9,349,600 $1,646,900 $10,996,500
J. SOUTH BOISE WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,583,100 $719,500 $6,302,600
Inmate Labor
Fund 175,500 175,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 42,800 42,800
Penitentiary Endowment Income
Fund 0 9,000 9,000
TOTAL $5,583,100 $946,800 $6,529,900
K. MOUNTAIN VIEW TRANSFORMATION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,372,500 $1,725,000 $9,097,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 150,000 150,000
TOTAL $7,372,500 $1,875,000 $9,247,500
DIVISIONTOTAL $156,045,800 $33,991,500 $160,000 $190,197,300
III. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $36,384,400 $36,384,400
IV. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS:
A. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $30,384,600 $10,112,000 $1,000,000 $41,496,600
Inmate Labor
Fund 115,600 115,600
Parolee Supervision
Fund 7,449,100 1,826,600 9,275,700
Drug and Mental Health Court Supervision
Fund 388,100 27,200 415,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 396,100 396,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 0 595,300 400,000 995,300
TOTAL $38,617,900 $12,676,700 $1,400,000 $52,694,600
B. COMMUNITY REENTRY CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,844,400 $92,500 $6,936,900
State-Directed Opioid Settlement
Fund 170,900 423,600 594,500
Inmate Labor
Fund 4,668,600 2,724,200 7,392,800
TOTAL $11,683,900 $3,240,300 $14,924,200
DIVISIONTOTAL $50,301,800 $15,917,000 $1,400,000 $67,618,800
V. COMMUNITY-BASED SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,946,000 $46,100 $1,846,500 $3,838,600
VI. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $66,356,900 $66,356,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 135,000 135,000
TOTAL $66,491,900 $66,491,900
(2) DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE CORRECTIONS:
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,870,300 $1,508,800 $4,379,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 16,400 16,400
TOTAL $2,870,300 $1,525,200 $4,395,500
II. COMMUNITY, OPERATIONS, AND PROGRAM SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,731,100 $273,800 $7,094,300 $9,099,200
Juvenile Corrections
Fund 110,000 110,000
Juvenile Corrections - Cigarette/Tobacco Tax
Fund 4,375,000 4,375,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 327,000 327,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 199,600 521,000 720,600
TOTAL $1,731,100 $583,400 $12,317,300 $14,631,800
III. INSTITUTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,544,300 $2,826,300 $2,553,500 $36,924,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 238,600 460,000 698,600
State Juvenile Corrections Center Endowment Income
Fund 1,073,800 1,073,800
Federal Grant
Fund 235,200 768,400 475,400 1,479,000
TOTAL $31,779,500 $4,907,100 $3,488,900 $40,175,500
DIVISIONTOTAL $36,380,900 $7,015,700 $15,806,200 $59,202,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(3) IDAHO STATE POLICE:
I. BRAND INSPECTION:
FROM:
State Brand Board
Fund $3,581,500 $535,500 $4,117,000
II. DIVISION OF IDAHO STATE POLICE:
A. DIRECTOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,603,100 $190,500 $2,793,600
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 163,000 2,500 165,500
Peace Officers Training
Fund 187,900 187,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 4,300 73,300 77,600
Federal Grant
Fund 85,700 18,100 103,800
TOTAL $3,044,000 $284,400 $3,328,400
B. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,130,000 $338,800 $2,468,800
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 275,200 6,400 281,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 132,700 7,200 139,900
TOTAL $2,537,900 $352,400 $2,890,300
C. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $9,785,500 $880,300 $10,665,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 1,285,800 29,100 1,314,900
Drug & DWUI Enforcement Donation
Fund 211,700 505,400 717,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 196,200 196,200
Federal Grant
Fund 154,200 658,500 $210,000 1,022,700
TOTAL $11,633,400 $2,073,300 $210,000 $13,916,700
D. PATROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $33,325,700 $4,933,600 $503,900 $38,763,200
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund 679,100 64,500 743,600
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 4,013,900 115,000 4,128,900
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 633,100 79,900 $67,800 780,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,199,000 179,800 1,378,800
Federal Grant
Fund 3,708,400 1,121,400 0 4,132,200 8,962,000
TOTAL $43,559,200 $6,494,200 $503,900 $4,200,000 $54,757,300
E. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $160,700 $180,800 $341,500
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 1,945,300 528,500 2,473,800
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 303,100 5,600 308,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 4,600 12,500 17,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 90,300 10,000 100,300
TOTAL $2,504,000 $737,400 $3,241,400
F. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $962,500 $3,249,900 $4,212,400
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 91,200 5,900 97,100
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 28,800 2,400 31,200
Idaho Law Enforcement Telecommunications
Fund 928,900 1,560,000 2,488,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,234,500 1,905,900 4,140,400
Federal Grant
Fund 47,000 85,800 132,800
TOTAL $4,292,900 $6,809,900 $11,102,800
G. FORENSIC SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $6,134,500 $1,068,100 $7,202,600
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 522,000 22,900 544,900
Drug & DWUI Enforcement Donation
Fund 6,600 490,600 497,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 202,400 131,500 333,900
Federal Grant
Fund 1,338,000 1,972,500 3,310,500
TOTAL $8,203,500 $3,685,600 $11,889,100
DIVISIONTOTAL $75,774,900 $20,437,200 $503,900 $4,410,000 $101,126,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING ACADEMY:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund $35,000 $14,800 $49,800
Peace Officers Training
Fund 3,075,600 2,091,400 $155,900 5,322,900
Misdemeanor Probation Training
Fund 21,400 30,400 30,000 81,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 29,000 29,000
Federal Grant
Fund 37,500 221,200 0 258,700
TOTAL $3,169,500 $2,386,800 $185,900 $5,742,200
IV. RACING COMMISSION:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $240,700 $172,400 $413,100
Pari-Mutuel Distribution
Fund 0 0 $30,000 30,000
TOTAL $240,700 $172,400 $30,000 $443,100
GRANDTOTAL $342,055,700 $200,223,900 $663,900 $23,678,600 $566,622,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the departments in Public Safety is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Correction ...................................2,254.35
Department of Juvenile Corrections ...........................396.00
Idaho State Police ...........................................646.09
SECTION 3. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS -- DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTION. The Department of Correction is hereby exempted from the pro-
visions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers be-
tween programs for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2026,


through June 30, 2027; provided, however, moneys appropriated to the County
and Out-of-State Placement Program and the Medical Services Program may only
be transferred between said programs. Legislative appropriations shall not
be transferred from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the
Legislature.
SECTION 4. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.